Idaho, session 2025, H0267.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 31-819, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
31-819. PUBLICATION OF PROCEEDINGS. (1) To The board of county commis-
sioners shall cause to be published monthly such statement as will clearly
give notice to the public of all its acts and proceedings, and, shall include
including a brief financial summary indicating the total amount spent from
each county fund during the month. A more detailed report of expenditures
may be published if deemed necessary by the board. Monthly publication of
acts and proceedings shall not be required for any county that maintains a
publicly accessible website on which agendas and minutes of the meetings of
the board of county commissioners are posted.
(2) Annually, a full financial report shall be prepared and available
for public inspection which that shows for each fund the sources of income,
expenditures during the year, current fund balances, and other financial in-
formation as determined by the board. Within thirty (30) days of the annual
audit's preparation as provided in section 31-1701, Idaho Code, the board
shall cause to be published a summary of the balance sheet and a summary of
the statement of revenues and expenditures. Such statements, as well as all
other public notices of proceedings of, or to be had before the board, not
otherwise specially provided for, must be published in accordance with the
requirements of chapter 1, title 60, Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.